District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2403

Junk vehicles; nuisances.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 4, 36 DCR 4575
Oct 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 13(c)(3), 50 DCR 6579

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-833.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(c)(3) of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(c)(3) of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).
See note § 40-812.1.

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2401.

Effective Dates

Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.

Editor's Notes

Effect of repeal provisions: Section 14 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “Any repeal of a law or regulation by this act shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or any other action made or taken pursuant to such law or regulation.”

Application of Law 15-35: Section 15 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “This act shall apply to all vehicles impounded after its effective date. This act shall also apply to all vehicles impounded prior to its effective date provided that notice is sent to the owners and lien holders in accordance with the provisions of subsections 7(b) or (c), as is applicable.”